Utah statutes.
77-38-4.   Right to be present, to be heard, and to file an amicus brief on
appeal -- Control of disruptive acts or irrelevant statements -- Statements
from persons in custody.
(1)  The victim of a crime shall have the right:
(a)  to be present at the important criminal or juvenile justice hearings
provided in Subsections 77-38-2(5)(a) through (f);
(b)  to be heard at the important criminal or juvenile justice hearings
provided in Subsections 77-38-2(5)(b), (c), (d), and (f);
(c)  to submit a written statement in any action on appeal related to that
crime;  and
(d)  upon request to the judge hearing the matter, to be present and heard at
the initial appearance of the person suspected of committing the conduct or
criminal offense against the victim on issues relating to whether to release a
defendant or minor and, if so, under what conditions release may occur.
(2)  This chapter shall not confer any right to the victim of a crime to be
heard:
(a)  at any criminal trial, including the sentencing phase of a capital trial
under Section 76-3-207 or at any preliminary hearing, unless called as a
witness; and
(b)  at any delinquency trial or at any preliminary hearing in a minor's case,
unless called as a witness.
(3)  The right of a victim or representative of a victim to be present at
trial is subject to Rule 615 of the Utah Rules of Evidence.
(4)  Nothing in this chapter shall deprive the court of the right to prevent
or punish disruptive conduct nor give the victim of a crime the right to
engage in disruptive conduct.
(5)  The court shall have the right to limit any victim's statement to matters
that are relevant to the proceeding.
(6)  In all cases where the number of victims exceeds five, the court may
limit the in-court oral statements it receives from victims in its discretion
to a few representative statements.
(7)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, a victim's right to be
heard may be exercised at the victim's discretion in any appropriate fashion,
including an oral, written, audiotaped, or videotaped statement or direct or
indirect information that has been provided to be included in any presentence
report.
(8)  If the victim of a crime is a person who is in custody as a pretrial
detainee, as a prisoner following conviction for an offense, or as a juvenile
who has committed an act that would be an offense if committed by an adult, or
who is in custody for mental or psychological treatment, the right to be heard
under this chapter shall be exercised by submitting a written statement to the
court.
(9)  The court may exclude any oral statement from a victim on the grounds of
the victim's incompetency as provided in Rule 601(a) of Utah Rules of
Evidence.
(10)  Except in juvenile court cases, the Constitution may not be construed as
limiting the existing rights of the prosecution to introduce evidence in
support of a capital sentence.
